District of Columbia statutes.
29-304.41

Corporation’s acquisition of its own shares.

(a)

A corporation may acquire its own shares and shares so acquired shall constitute authorized but unissued shares.

(b)

If the articles of incorporation prohibit the reissue of the acquired shares, the number of authorized shares shall be reduced by the number of shares acquired.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-308.05.